Hawaii statutes.
§436B-22 Relinquishment no bar to
jurisdiction. The forfeiture, nonrenewal, surrender, or voluntary
relinquishment of a license by a licensee shall not bar jurisdiction by the
licensing authority to proceed with any investigation, action, or proceeding to
revoke, suspend, condition, or limit the licensee's license or fine the
licensee. [L 1991, c 111, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 202, §18]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next